Utah statutes.
53A-1a-505.   Application process -- Contract.
(1) (a)  An applicant seeking authorization of a charter school from the State
Charter School Board shall provide a copy of the application to the local
school board of the school district in which the proposed charter school shall
be located either before or at the same time it files its application with the
State Charter School Board.
(b)  The local board may review the application and may offer suggestions or
recommendations to the applicant or the State Charter School Board prior to
its acting on the application.
(c)  The State Charter School Board shall give due consideration to
suggestions or recommendations made by the local school board under Subsection
(1)(b).
(d)  The State Charter School Board shall review and, by majority vote, either
approve or deny the application.
(e)  The State Board of Education shall, by majority vote, within 60 days
after action by the State Charter School Board under Subsection (1)(d):
(i)  approve or deny an application approved by the State Charter School
Board; or
(ii)  hear an appeal, if any, of an application denied by the State Charter
School Board.
(f)  The State Board of Education's action under Subsection (1)(d) is final
action subject to judicial review.
(g)  A charter school application may not be denied on the basis that the
establishment of the charter school will have any or all of the following
impacts on a public school, including another charter school:
(i)  an enrollment decline;
(ii)  a decrease in funding; or
(iii)  a modification of programs or services.
(2)  The State Board of Education shall make a rule providing a timeline for
the opening of a charter school following the approval of a charter school
application by the State Charter School Board.
(3) (a)  After approval of a charter school application, the applicant and the
State Charter School Board shall set forth the terms and conditions for the
operation of the charter school in a written contractual agreement.
(b)  The agreement is the school's charter.
(4) (a)  A school holding a charter granted by a local school board may
request a charter from the State Charter School Board.
(b)  This section shall govern the application and approval of a charter
requested under Subsection (4)(a).
